Wisconsin, session 2025, SB249.
do enact as follows:SB249,13Section 1. 17.03 (10m) of the statutes is created to read:SB249,2,3417.03 (10m) If the office is an appointive state office for a fixed term, the 5incumbent’s term expires. In this subsection, “appointive state office” means an 1appointive office of any department, agency, board, office, commission, authority, or 2other body in state government created or authorized to be created by the 3constitution or any law, but not including the legislature and the courts.SB249,2,44